Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-3718
Visitors
committee; budget.

The governing body of the county shall
annually set the budget, if any, under which the committee shall operate.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1256;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 18.